Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1613.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6302 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 6302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Custodial interrogation." The following:(1) Questioning or other conduct by a law enforcement officer which:<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 (i) is reasonably likely to elicit an incriminating response from an individual; and(ii) occurs when a reasonable individual in the same circumstances would consider that the individual was in custody.(2) The term includes giving a required warning, advice of rights of the individual being questioned and waiver of rights by the individual.* * *Section 2. Section 6326(a) introductory paragraph, (1) and (3) of Title 42 are amended to read:§ 6326. Release or delivery to court.(a) General rule.--A person taking a child into custody[, with all reasonable speed] shall immediately and without first taking the child elsewhere[, shall]:(1) notify [the parent, guardian or other custodian of the apprehension of the child and his whereabouts;], or cause to be notified, the parent, guardian or other custodian of: (i) the child's location;(ii) the reason for the child being taken into custody; and(iii) instructions on how the parent, guardian or custodian may make immediate in-person contact with the child;* * *(3) bring the child before the court or deliver him to a detention or shelter care facility designated by the court or to a medical facility if the child is believed to suffer from a serious physical or mental condition or illness which requires prompt treatment. He shall promptly give written 20250HB1613PN2440 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 notice, together with a statement of the reason for taking the child into custody, to a parent, guardian, or other custodian and to the court.* * *Section 3. Title 42 is amended by adding sections to read:§ 6329 6329.1 . Mandatory counsel. (a) Custodial interrogation.--A law enforcement officer may not conduct a custodial interrogation of a child until ALL OF THE FOLLOWING HAVE OCCURRED : (1) The child has consulted with an attorney who is:(i) retained by the parent, guardian or custodian of the child; or(ii) provided by the office of the public defender.(2) The law enforcement officer has made an effort reasonably calculated to give actual notice to the parent, guardian or custodian of the child that the child will be interrogated.(b) Conditions of counsel.--A consultation with an attorney under this section:(1) Shall be:(i) Conducted in a manner consistent with the Rules of Professional Conduct.(ii) Confidential.(2) May be:(i) in person; or(ii) by telephone or video conference.(c) Communication with parents.--To the extent practicable and consistent with the Rules of Professional Conduct, an attorney providing consultation under this section shall communicate and coordinate with the parent, guardian or 20250HB1613PN2440 - 3 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 custodian of the child in custody.(d) Conditions of counsel.--The requirement of consultation with an attorney under this section:(1) May not be waived.(2) Applies regardless of whether the child is in delinquency or criminal proceedings.(e) Record of counsel.--(1) A law enforcement agency conducting an interrogation of a child shall maintain a record of the notification or attempted notification of a parent, guardian or custodian under section 6326 (relating to release or delivery to court), including:(i) a signed statement by a duly authorized law enforcement officer employed by the agency that an attempt to notify a parent, guardian or custodian was made;(ii) the name of the person sought to be notified; and(iii) the method of the attempted notification.(2) A law enforcement agency conducting an interrogation of a child shall maintain a record of the name of the attorney contacted and the county in which the attorney provided the consultation.(3) An attorney contacted to provide legal consultation to a child under this section shall provide to a law enforcement officer the information required to be maintained under paragraph (2).(f) Exception.--(1) Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, a law enforcement officer may conduct an otherwise lawful 20250HB1613PN2440 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 custodial interrogation of a child if:(i) the law enforcement officer reasonably believes that the information sought is necessary to protect against an imminent threat to public safety; and(ii) the questions posed to the child by the law enforcement officer are limited to those questions reasonably necessary to obtain the information necessary to protect against the imminent threat to public safety.(2) As used in this subsection, the term "threat to public safety" shall be construed in a manner consistent with the judicially recognized exception to the requirements of Miranda v. Arizona 384 U.S. 436 (1966).§ 6329.1 6329.2 . Child interrogation. (a) Recording.--(1) Unless it is impossible or unsafe to do so, an interrogation of a child shall be recorded.(2) In a jurisdiction that has adopted the use of body-worn digital recording devices by law enforcement officers, the interrogation of a child may be recorded using a body-worn digital recording device in a manner that is consistent with departmental policies regarding the use of body-worn digital recording devices.(3) In a jurisdiction that has not adopted the use of body-worn digital recording devices, the interrogation of a child may be recorded using other video and audio recording technology in a manner that is consistent with any policies of the law enforcement agency regarding the use of video and audio recording technology.(4) A child shall be informed if the interrogation is being recorded.20250HB1613PN2440 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Presumption.--(1) There is a rebuttable presumption that a statement made by a child during a custodial interrogation is inadmissible in a delinquency proceeding or a criminal prosecution against that child if a law enforcement officer negligently or willfully failed to comply with the requirements of this section, section 6326 (relating to release of delivery to court) or section 6329 (relating to mandatory counsel).(2) The State may overcome the presumption by showing, by clear and convincing evidence, that the statement was made knowingly, intelligently and voluntarily and that the statement was not made by a child under duress or while the child was experiencing a mental health crisis.(B) INADMISSIBILITY.--A STATEMENT MADE BY A CHILD DURING A CUSTODIAL INTERROGATION IS INADMISSIBLE IN A DELINQUENCY PROCEEDING OR A CRIMINAL PROSECUTION AGAINST THAT CHILD UNDER EITHER OF THE FOLLOWING CIRCUMSTANCES:(1) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER NEGLIGENTLY OR WILLFULLY FAILED TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION, SECTION 6326 (RELATING TO RELEASE OF DELIVERY TO COURT) OR SECTION 6329.1 (RELATING TO MANDATORY COUNSEL).(2) THE CUSTODIAL INTERROGATION OCCURRED WITHOUT THE PRESENCE OF THE CHILD'S PARENT, GUARDIAN, CUSTODIAN OR ATTORNEY.§ 6329.3. REFUSAL TO BE RECORDED ELECTRONICALLY. (A) REFUSAL TO PARTICIPATE.--SECTION 6329.2(A) (RELATING TO CHILD INTERROGATION) SHALL NOT APPLY IF THE CHILD TO BE INTERROGATED OR T HE CHILD'S PARENT, GUARDIAN, CUSTODIAN OR ATTORNEY INDICATES THAT THE CHILD WILL NOT PARTICIPATE IN THE 20250HB1613PN2440 - 6 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INTERROGATION IF THE INTERROGATION IS RECORDED ELECTRONICALLY. IF FEASIBLE, THE AGREEMENT TO PARTICIPATE WITHOUT RECORDING SHALL BE RECORDED ELECTRONICALLY. (B) REFUSAL TO CONTINUE.--IF, DURING A CHILD INTERROGATION UNDER SECTION 6329.2, THE CHILD BEING INTERROGATED, OR THE CHILD'S PARENT, GUARDIAN, CUSTODIAN OR ATTORNEY, INDICATES THAT THE CHILD WILL NOT PARTICIPATE IN FURTHER INTERROGATION UNLESS ELECTRONIC RECORDING CEASES, THE REMAINDER OF THE CHILD INTERROGATION NEED NOT BE RECORDED ELECTRONICALLY. IF FEASIBLE, THE AGREEMENT TO PARTICIPATE WITHOUT FURTHER RECORDING SHALL BE RECORDED ELECTRONICALLY.(C) ENCOURAGING REFUSAL.--A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER MAY NOT, WITH INTENT TO AVOID THE REQUIREMENT OF ELECTRONIC RECORDING UNDER SECTION 6329.2(A), ENCOURAGE AN INDIVIDUAL TO REQUEST THAT AN INTERROGATION NOT BE RECORDED.Section 4. Section 6373 of Title 42 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6373. Powers and duties.The commission shall have the power and is required to do the following:* * *(5) Adopt rules concerning age-appropriate language to be used to advise a child who is taken into custody of the child's rights.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1613PN2440 - 7 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425